Louisiana, session 2026, HB714.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:390.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§390.2. Caddo parish railroad crossings; remediation or removal
A.(1) Owners of railroad crossings within the parish of Caddo shall have one
year from the effective date of this Act to remediate or remove any existing blighted
or abandoned railroad crossings and associated structures.
(2) Owners of railroad crossings within the parish of Caddo which are found
to be blighted or abandoned by local governing authorities after the effective date of
this Act shall have one year from the finding or declaration by the local governing
authority to remediate or remove any blighted or abandoned railroad crossings and
associated structures.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-348 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 714
B. Underpasses of railroad crossings within the parish of Caddo shall be
maintained and preserved, including but not limited to painting and rust removal, to
prevent them from becoming a blight or nuisance.